Wisconsin, session 2025, SB882.
do enact as follows:SB882,11Section 1. 302.113 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,3,32302.113 (2) Except as provided in subs. (3) and (9), an inmate subject to this 3section is entitled to release to extended supervision after he or she has served the 1term of confinement in prison portion of the sentence imposed under s. 973.01, as 2modified by the sentencing court under sub. (9g) or s. 302.045 (3m) (b) 1., 302.05 (3) 3(c) 2. a., 973.018, 973.195 (1r), or 973.198, if applicable.SB882,24Section 2. 302.114 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,3,85302.114 (1) An inmate is subject to this section if he or she is serving a life 6sentence imposed under s. 973.014 (1g) (a) 1. or 2. or (3) (c). An inmate serving a life 7sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) or 973.014 (1g) (a) 3. is not eligible for release to 8extended supervision under this section.SB882,39Section 3. 302.114 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,3,1410302.114 (2) Except as provided in subs. (3) and (9), an inmate subject to this 11section may petition the sentencing court for release to extended supervision after 12he or she has served 20 years, if the inmate was sentenced under s. 973.014 (1g) (a) 131., or after he or she has reached the extended supervision eligibility date set by the 14court, if the inmate was sentenced under s. 973.014 (1g) (a) 2. or (3) (c).SB882,415Section 4. 302.114 (5) (cs) of the statutes is created to read:SB882,3,1916302.114 (5) (cs) If the inmate is a youthful offender, as defined in s. 973.014 17(3) (a), the court shall consider the mitigating factors under s. 973.017 (2c) (a) to (o) 18and any relevant information described in s. 973.018 (5) (b) when determining 19eligibility for release to extended supervision under this subsection.SB882,520Section 5. 303.065 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,4,321303.065 (1) (b) 1. A person serving a life sentence, other than a life sentence 22specified in subd. 2., may be considered for work release only after he or she has 23reached parole eligibility under s. 304.06 (1) (b) or 973.014 (1) (a) or (b) or (3) (b), 1whichever is applicable, or he or she has reached his or her extended supervision 2eligibility date under s. 302.114 (9) (am) or 973.014 (1g) (a) 1. or 2. or (3) (c), 3whichever is applicable.SB882,64Section 6. 304.02 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,4,75304.02 (5) Notwithstanding subs. (1) to (3), a prisoner who is serving a life 6sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) (c) or 973.014 (1) (c) or, (1g), or (3) (c) is not eligible for 7release to parole supervision under this section.SB882,78Section 7. 304.06 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB882,4,109304.06 (1) (a) 3. “Youthful offender” has the meaning given in s. 973.014 (3) 10(a).SB882,811Section 8. 304.06 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,5,412304.06 (1) (b) Except as provided in s. 961.49 (2), 1999 stats., sub. (1m) or s. 13302.045 (3), 302.05 (3) (b), 973.01 (6), or 973.0135, or 973.018, the parole 14commission may parole an inmate of the Wisconsin state prisons or any felon or any 15person serving at least one year or more in a county house of correction or a county 16reforestation camp organized under s. 303.07, when he or she has served 25 percent 17of the sentence imposed for the offense, or 6 months, whichever is greater. Except 18as provided in s. 939.62 (2m) (c) or 973.014 (1) (b) or (c), (1g) or, (2), or (3) (b) or (c), 19the parole commission may parole an inmate serving a life term when he or she has 20served 20 years, as modified by the formula under s. 302.11 (1) and subject to 21extension under s. 302.11 (1q) and (2), if applicable. The person serving the life 22term shall be given credit for time served prior to sentencing under s. 973.155, 23including good time under s. 973.155 (4). The secretary may grant special action 1parole releases under s. 304.02. The department or the parole commission shall not 2provide any convicted offender or other person sentenced to the department’s 3custody any parole eligibility or evaluation until the person has been confined at 4least 60 days following sentencing.SB882,95Section 9. 304.06 (1) (bc) of the statutes is created to read:SB882,5,96304.06 (1) (bc) 1. If the inmate who applies for parole under this subsection is 7a youthful offender, the parole commission shall consider the mitigating factors 8under s. 973.017 (2c) (a) to (o) and any relevant information described in s. 973.018 9(5) (b) when determining whether to release the inmate to parole.SB882,5,11102. A youthful offender has the right to attend and may be represented by 11counsel at any interviews or hearings concerning his or her application for parole.SB882,5,15123. If the parole commission denies a youthful offender’s application for parole, 13the parole commission shall provide in writing the reasons for the denial and shall 14set a date for reconsideration that is no more than 3 years after the date the 15application was denied.SB882,1016Section 10. 304.071 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,5,1917304.071 (2) If a prisoner is not eligible for parole under s. 961.49 (2), 1999 18stats., or s. 939.62 (2m) (c), 973.01 (6), 973.014 (1) (c) or, (1g), or (3) (c), 973.018, or 19973.032 (5), he or she is not eligible for parole under this section.SB882,1120Section 11. 939.62 (2m) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,5,2321939.62 (2m) (b) (intro.) The actor is a persistent repeater if the offense for 22which he or she is presently being sentenced was committed on or after the date he 23or she attained the age of 18 and one of the following applies:SB882,121Section 12. 950.04 (1v) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,6,42950.04 (1v) (g) To have reasonable attempts made to notify the victim of 3hearings or court proceedings, as provided under ss. 302.113 (9g) (g) 2., 302.114 (6), 4938.27 (4m) and (6), 938.273 (2), 971.095 (3) and, 972.14 (3) (b), and 973.018 (5).SB882,135Section 13. 950.04 (1v) (gm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,6,86950.04 (1v) (gm) To have reasonable attempts made to notify the victim of 7petitions for sentence adjustment as provided under s. 973.018 (4) (a) and (e), 8973.09 (3m), 973.195 (1r) (d), or 973.198.SB882,149Section 14. 950.04 (1v) (m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,6,1210950.04 (1v) (m) To provide statements concerning sentencing, disposition, or 11parole, as provided under ss. 304.06 (1) (e), 938.32 (1) (b) 1g., 938.335 (3m) (ag), and 12972.14 (3) (a), and 973.018 (5) (d).SB882,1513Section 15. 973.01 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,6,1614973.01 (3) Not applicable to life sentences. If a person is being sentenced 15for a felony that is punishable by life imprisonment, he or she is not subject to this 16section but shall be sentenced under s. 973.014 (1g) or (3).SB882,1617Section 16. 973.01 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB882,6,2318973.01 (4) No good time; extension or reduction of term of 19imprisonment. A person sentenced to a bifurcated sentence under sub. (1) shall 20serve the term of confinement in prison portion of the sentence without reduction 21for good behavior. The term of confinement in prison portion is subject to extension 22under s. 302.113 (3) and, if applicable, to reduction under s. 302.045 (3m), 302.05 23(3) (c) 2. a., 302.113 (9g), 973.018, 973.195 (1r), or 973.198. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb882 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb882 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB882 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB882 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB882: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting